Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.010

Authorized shares.

(1) The articles of incorporation must prescribe the classes of shares and the number of shares of each class that the corporation is authorized to issue.

(a) If more than one class of shares is authorized, the articles of incorporation must prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class, and, prior to the issuance of shares of a class, the preferences, limitations, voting powers, and relative rights of that class must be described in the articles of incorporation.

(b) Preferences, limitations, voting powers, or relative rights of or on any class or series of shares or the holders thereof may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation in accordance with RCW 23B.01.200(3).

(c) All shares of a class must have preferences, limitations, voting powers, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except to the extent otherwise permitted by (b) of this subsection or RCW 23B.06.020.

(2) The articles of incorporation must authorize (a) one or more classes of shares that together have unlimited voting rights, and (b) one or more classes of shares, which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights, that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

(3) The articles of incorporation may authorize one or more classes of shares that:

(a) Have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote, except to the extent prohibited by this title;

(b) Are redeemable or convertible as specified in the articles of incorporation (i) at the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or upon the occurrence of a designated event, (ii) for cash, indebtedness, securities, or other property, (iii) in a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a designated formula;

(c) Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative; or

(d) Have preference over any other class of shares with respect to distributions, including dividends and distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation.

(4) Terms of shares may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation in accordance with RCW 23B.01.200(3).

(5) The description of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of share classes in subsection (3) of this section is not exhaustive.

[ 2020 c 194 s 5; 1998 c 104 s 1; 1989 c 165 s 44.]